California statutes. Elections Code
1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011,
 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

6121.01--the following census blocks:

1007

6135.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064

6139.00--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4001, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0028, 0029, 0030, 0031, 0032, 0033, 0035

SANTA CLARA

Whole Tracts in Santa Clara County

5021.01, 5021.03, 5021.04, 5022.02, 5022.03, 5022.04, 5025.00, 5026.01, 5026.03, 5026.04, 5027.01, 5027.03, 5027.04, 5028.00, 5029.01, 5029.02, 5029.03, 5029.06, 5029.07, 5029.08, 5029.09, 5029.10, 5030.01, 5030.02, 5031.05, 5031.10, 5031.11, 5031.17, 5031.18, 5031.24, 5031.25, 5031.26, 5032.11, 5032.12, 5032.13, 5032.17, 5032.19, 5032.20, 5032.21, 5032.22, 5033.04, 5033.37, 5034.01, 5034.02, 5046.01, 5064.02, 5065.02, 5065.03, 5065.04, 5066.01, 5066.03, 5066.04,
 5066.06, 5067.01, 5067.02, 5067.03, 5068.01, 5068.02, 5068.03, 5068.04, 5069.00, 5070.02, 5070.03, 5070.04, 5071.00, 5072.03, 5072.05, 5072.06, 5073.01, 5073.02, 5074.01, 5074.02, 5075.00, 5091.08, 5091.09, 5091.11, 5092.01, 5092.02, 5093.02, 5093.03, 5093.04, 5094.01, 5094.03, 5094.04, 5095.00, 5096.00, 5097.00, 5098.01, 5098.02, 5099.01, 5099.02, 5100.02, 5101.00, 5102.00, 5103.00, 5104.00, 5105.00, 5106.00, 5107.00, 5108.01, 5108.02, 5108.03, 5109.00, 5110.00, 5111.00, 5112.00, 5113.01, 5113.02, 5114.00, 5115.01, 5115.02, 5116.08, 5116.09, 5117.01, 5117.02, 5117.04, 5117.05, 5119.15, 5130.00

Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County

5020.01--the following census blocks:

3023, 3024

5020.02--the following census blocks:

3031, 3032, 3033, 3036, 3038, 3039, 3040

5024.00--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016

5030.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026

5031.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004,
 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

5031.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014

5031.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

5031.23--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

5031.27--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001,
 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 2040

5032.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

5032.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010

5032.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

5033.05--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

5033.06--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

5035.04--the following census blocks:

3004, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4007, 4008

5035.06--the following census blocks:

1008

5035.07--the following census
 blocks:

1010

5036.02--the following census blocks:

3006, 3007

5047.00--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048

5062.02--the following census blocks:

2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020

5063.02--the
 following census blocks:

3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

5064.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

5065.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021

5066.05--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

5076.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005,
 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

5077.02--the following census blocks:

3005, 3006, 3008, 3015, 3016

5077.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

5077.05--the following census blocks:

2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 3001

5078.05--the following census blocks:

1003, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010

5079.03--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016

5079.04--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

5079.05--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014

5079.06--the following census blocks:

3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010

5084.01--the following census blocks:

5004, 5005, 5006, 5007

5091.02--the following census blocks:

2003

5091.07--the following census blocks:

1003

5091.10--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

5100.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006

5117.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006,
 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1035, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048, 1049, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109

5118.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012,
 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3002, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3039, 3041, 3043, 3044, 3062, 3063

5119.11--the following census blocks:

1007

5119.13--the following census blocks:

2007, 2015

5119.14--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003,
 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012, 2013

5119.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

5119.18--the following census blocks:

2015

5120.24--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008

5120.27--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014

5120.52--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1007, 1011

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21417.

Congressional District 17 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 17

ALAMEDA

Whole Tracts in Alameda County

4415.25, 4431.02, 4431.05, 4432.00, 4433.01, 4433.21, 4433.22, 4441.00, 4442.00, 4443.01, 4443.03, 4443.04, 4444.00, 4445.00, 4446.01, 4446.02

Partial Tracts in Alameda County

4415.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019,
 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 4032, 4035, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082

4415.24--the following census blocks:

2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011

4416.01--the following census blocks:

3005

4416.02--the following census blocks:

3009

4417.01--the following census blocks:

1031, 2008

4427.00--the following census blocks:

3007

4428.00--the following census blocks:

1016

4429.00--the following census blocks:

4015

4430.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2010

4431.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3017

4431.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

9900.00--the following census blocks:

0016

SANTA CLARA

Whole Tracts in Santa Clara County

5003.00, 5004.00, 5005.00, 5006.00, 5019.01, 5037.08, 5038.03, 5038.04, 5043.07, 5043.11, 5043.14, 5043.15, 5043.16, 5043.17, 5043.18, 5043.19, 5043.20, 5043.21, 5043.22, 5043.23, 5044.10, 5044.11, 5044.12, 5044.13, 5044.14, 5044.15, 5044.16, 5044.18, 5044.21, 5044.22, 5044.23, 5044.24, 5045.05, 5045.06, 5045.07, 5045.08, 5045.09, 5045.10, 5046.02, 5048.02, 5048.05, 5048.06, 5048.07, 5048.08, 5049.02, 5049.03, 5050.06, 5050.07, 5050.10, 5050.11,
 5050.12, 5050.13, 5050.14, 5050.15, 5051.00, 5052.02, 5052.03, 5053.01, 5053.02, 5053.03, 5053.04, 5053.05, 5054.01, 5054.02, 5054.03, 5055.00, 5056.00, 5057.00, 5058.00, 5059.01, 5059.02, 5060.00, 5061.01, 5061.02, 5061.03, 5062.03, 5062.04, 5063.01, 5063.04, 5063.05, 5077.01, 5078.06, 5078.07, 5078.08, 5080.03, 5080.04, 5080.05, 5080.06, 5081.01, 5081.02, 5082.03, 5082.04, 5082.05, 5082.06, 5083.01, 5083.03, 5083.05, 5083.06, 5084.03, 5084.04, 5085.03, 5085.05, 5085.07, 5085.08, 5085.09, 5085.10, 5086.01, 5086.02, 5087.05, 5087.06, 5087.07, 5087.08, 5088.00, 5089.00, 5090.01, 5090.02, 5091.06

Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County

5001.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003

5002.00--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1020, 2003

5008.00--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1047, 1048

5019.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015

5020.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017,
 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028

5020.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3034, 3035, 3037, 3041

5036.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012

5037.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001

5038.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4019, 4021, 4023, 4024

5042.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1012, 1022, 1023, 1026, 1027

5042.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007

5043.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

5047.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1008, 1009

5062.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007, 2013, 4013

5063.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017,
 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

5064.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 4000

5065.05--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

5066.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2012

5076.00--the following census blocks:

1009, 1011, 1019

5077.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006,
 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3017, 3018

5077.04--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034

5077.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2014, 3000, 3002, 3003

5078.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029

5079.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

5079.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003,
 2004, 2017

5079.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3007, 3012

5079.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 4000, 4004

5084.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5008,
 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011

5091.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

5091.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

5091.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1012

5100.01--the following census blocks:

1004, 1010

5117.07--the following census blocks:

1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1024, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1047, 2040

5135.00--the following census blocks:

1020, 1027, 1064, 1065, 1068, 1069, 1073, 1074

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21418.

Congressional District 18 consists of the following:

Whole Counties in Congressional District 18

SAN BENITO

Partial Counties in Congressional District 18

FRESNO

Whole Tracts in Fresno County

0080.00, 0081.00

Partial Tracts in Fresno County

0078.01--the following census blocks:

2056, 2057, 2058, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2127, 2130, 2131, 2132

0078.02--the following census blocks:

2049

0079.03--the following census blocks:

1064, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1098, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049,
 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158

0083.04--the following census blocks:

1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1056, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1149, 1150, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159,
 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1167, 1168, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234

0084.02--the following census blocks:

2075, 2076, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2115, 2116, 2139

KINGS

Whole Tracts in Kings County

0017.02, 0017.03, 9818.00

Partial Tracts in Kings County

0016.01--the following census blocks:

1086, 1087, 1088, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1327, 1344, 1345, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1350, 1351, 1353, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473, 1474

MONTEREY

Whole Tracts in Monterey County

0001.01, 0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.05, 0001.06, 0002.00, 0003.00, 0004.00, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.00, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0009.00, 0012.00, 0013.00, 0014.00, 0015.00, 0016.00, 0017.00, 0018.01, 0018.02, 0101.02, 0104.00, 0105.04, 0105.05, 0105.06, 0106.03, 0106.04, 0106.05, 0106.07, 0106.08, 0109.00, 0111.01, 0111.03, 0111.04, 0111.05, 0111.06, 0112.02, 0112.03, 0112.04, 0113.02, 0113.03, 0113.05, 0113.06, 0148.00, 9800.00

Partial Tracts in Monterey County

0101.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

0102.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1010, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0103.05--the following census blocks:

3001, 3005

0103.06--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1025, 1051

0105.01--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011,
 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3042

0106.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1078, 1081, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1119, 1123, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024

0107.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1036

0108.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058,
 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010

0110.02--the following census blocks:

1051, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044

0114.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079,
 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249,
 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1295, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1341, 1342, 1343, 1344, 1345, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1350, 1351, 1352, 1353, 1354, 1355, 1356, 1357, 1358, 1359, 1360, 1361, 1362, 1363, 1364, 1365, 1366, 1367, 1368, 1369, 1370, 1371, 1372, 1373, 1374, 1375, 1376, 1377, 1378, 1379, 1380, 1381, 1382, 1383, 1384, 1385, 1386, 1387, 1388, 1389, 1390, 1391, 1392, 1393, 1394, 1395, 1396, 1397, 1398, 1399, 1400, 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404, 1405, 1406, 1407, 1408, 1409, 1410, 1411, 1412, 1413, 1414, 1415, 1416, 1417, 1418, 1419,
 1420, 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, 1426, 1427, 1428, 1429, 1430, 1431, 1432, 1433, 1434, 1435, 1436, 1437, 1438, 1439, 1440, 1441, 1442, 1443, 1444, 1445, 1446, 1447, 1448, 1449, 1450, 1451, 1452, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473, 1474, 1475, 1476, 1477, 1478, 1479, 1480, 1481, 1482, 1483, 1484, 1485, 1486, 1487, 1488, 1489, 1490, 1491, 1492, 1493, 1494, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2041, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111,
 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304, 2305, 2306, 2307, 2308, 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312, 2313, 2314, 2315, 2316, 2317, 2318, 2319, 2320, 2321, 2322, 2323, 2324, 2325, 2326, 2327, 2328, 2329, 2330, 2331, 2332, 2333, 2334, 2335, 2336, 2337, 2338, 2339, 2340, 2341, 2342, 2343, 2344, 2345, 2346, 2347, 2348, 2349, 2350, 2351, 2352, 2353, 2354, 2355, 2356, 2357, 2358, 2359, 2360, 2361, 2362, 2363, 2364, 2365, 2366, 2367, 2368, 2369, 2370, 2371,
 2372, 2373, 2374, 2375, 2376, 2377, 2378, 2379, 2380, 2381, 2382, 2383, 2384, 2385, 2386, 2387, 2388, 2389, 2390, 2391, 2392, 2393, 2394, 2395, 2396, 2397, 2398, 2399, 2400, 2401, 2402, 2403, 2404, 2405, 2406, 2407, 2408, 2414, 2415, 2416, 2419, 2420, 2421, 2424, 2425, 2426, 2428, 2429, 2430, 2431, 2432, 2433, 2434, 2435, 2436, 2437, 2438

0115.02--the following census blocks:

1066, 1067, 1068, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1147, 1150, 1151, 1152

0145.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048, 1049, 1053, 1054, 1055, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009,
 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0146.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2003, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0147.00--the following census blocks:

4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4010, 4011, 4012

SANTA CLARA

Whole Tracts in Santa Clara County

5009.01, 5009.02, 5010.00, 5011.01, 5011.02, 5012.00, 5013.00, 5014.01, 5014.02, 5015.01, 5015.02, 5016.01, 5016.02, 5017.00, 5018.00, 5023.01, 5023.02, 5031.12, 5031.13, 5035.08, 5035.10, 5037.03, 5037.07, 5037.10, 5037.11, 5037.12, 5037.13, 5039.02, 5039.03, 5040.01, 5040.02, 5041.01, 5041.02,
 5123.08, 5123.09, 5123.10, 5123.12, 5124.02, 5125.05, 5125.09, 5125.10, 5125.11, 5125.12, 5125.13, 5125.14, 5125.16, 5126.02, 5126.03, 5126.04

Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County

5001.00--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026

5002.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

5008.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1007, 1015, 1027, 1028, 1044, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033

5019.02--the following census blocks:

1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

5024.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 5000, 5001, 5005, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009

5031.21--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

5031.22--the following census blocks:

1006

5031.23--the following census blocks:

1000

5033.06--the following census
 blocks:

1000

5033.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

5033.22--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007

5033.26--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007, 3008

5033.30--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003

5035.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005,
 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4005, 4006

5035.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

5035.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009

5035.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014

5035.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006,
 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

5036.01--the following census blocks:

1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

5036.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008

5037.09--the following census blocks:

3000

5038.02--the following census blocks:

4008, 4009, 4010, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 4022

5042.01--the following census blocks:

1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1024, 1025, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

5042.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

5043.08--the following census blocks:

2019, 2020, 2021

5122.00--the following census blocks:

2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042

5123.05--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1028, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2010

5123.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004,
 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027
